Hawaii statutes.
§201-72.5 Aerospace advisory committee.
(a) There is established an aerospace advisory committee within the office of
aerospace development of the department of business, economic development, and
tourism for administrative purposes. The committee shall be composed of fifteen
members appointed by the governor, as provided in section 26-34, except as
otherwise provided in this section. Of the fifteen members:

(1) Three members shall be representatives of the
aerospace industry. One member shall be appointed from a list of nominees
submitted by the president of the senate, and one member shall be appointed
from a list of nominees submitted by the speaker of the house of
representatives;

(2) Three members shall be representatives of the
aerospace industry in this State. One member shall be appointed from a list of
nominees submitted by the president of the senate, and one member shall be
appointed from a list of nominees submitted by the speaker of the house of
representatives;

(3) One member shall be a representative of
investment banking;

(4) Four members shall represent the economic
development boards of Kauai, Oahu, Maui, and Hawaii, respectively, to be
appointed, respectively, from a list of nominees submitted by each of these
economic development boards;

(5) Three members shall represent the University of
Hawaii at Manoa, University of Hawaii at Hilo, and University of Hawaii
community college system, respectively, to be appointed, one each, from a list
of nominees submitted by the University of Hawaii at Manoa, University of
Hawaii at Hilo, and University of Hawaii community college system,
respectively; and

(6) One member, not appointed under paragraphs (1)
through (5) of this subsection, to serve as chairperson, who shall have
experience, knowledge, and expertise in space-related activities and
development in the global and state aerospace industry.

(b) All members shall serve for a term of four
years. Any vacancies occurring in the membership of the committee shall be
filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the
original appointments.

(c) The purpose of the aerospace advisory
committee shall be to advise and assist the legislature and state agencies in
monitoring, assessing, and promoting aerospace development statewide by:

(1) Tracking state, national, and global trends and
priorities in aerospace development;

(2) Assisting in identifying and promoting
opportunities to expand and diversify aerospace development and
aerospace-related industries in this State;

(3) Supporting the office of aerospace development's
effort in networking with national and international aerospace agencies,
institutions, and organizations to develop public-private partnerships to
support the growth of aerospace development and aerospace-related industries in
this State;

(4) Recommending innovative scientific, educational,
and economic strategies and government and education policies to promote the
growth and diversification of the aerospace industry in this State; and

(5) Appointing temporary working groups, as deemed
appropriate in the committee's discretion, to assist the office of aerospace
development in research and analysis activities required to complete any report
to be submitted to the legislature and the governor by the office of aerospace
development.

(d) Members of the aerospace advisory
committee shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for necessary
expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their
duties as members of the committee.

(e) The committee shall convene for quarterly
meetings in the city and county of Honolulu; provided that any member who is
not a state resident may attend a meeting by teleconference.

(f) Administrative support to the committee,
including the development and dissemination of reports and advisory opinions,
shall be provided by the department of business, economic development, and
tourism. [L 2009, c 52, §1; am L 2013, c 108, §1 and c 158, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next